ukrainian.foma
read lexc ukrainian.lexc

define Lexicon;

# In the singular Dative and Locative cases г, к, х before -і ending change into з, ц, с
define HConstBeforeI  г -> з || _ "^" і;
define KConstBeforeI  к -> ц || _ "^" і;
define KhConstBeforeI х -> с || _ "^" і;

# Soft group
# Change the ending for soft group words with stems ending on й
define SoftChangeEndingGenDatLoc й "@P.SOFT.ON@" "^" і -> "@P.SOFT.ON@" "^" ї;
define SoftChangeEndingIns й "@P.SOFT.ON@" "^" ею -> "@P.SOFT.ON@" "^" єю;
define SoftChangeEndingVoc й "@P.SOFT.ON@" "^" е -> "@P.SOFT.ON@" "^" є;
# Remove the ь or й before the ending
define SoftRemoveSoftSign й -> 0 || _ "@P.SOFT.ON@" "^" *;

# In plural Genitive case, if there are two consonants before ending, then the vowel o appear between them
define InsertVowel [..] -> о || м _ к "@P.PLGEN.ON@" "^";

# In plural Genitive case the last vowel changes from о to і
define LastOToI о -> і || _ ? "@P.PLGEN.ON@";

define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

define Grammar 
        Lexicon .o.
        HConstBeforeI .o.
        KConstBeforeI .o.
        KhConstBeforeI .o.
        SoftChangeEndingGenDatLoc .o.
        SoftChangeEndingIns .o.
        SoftChangeEndingVoc .o.
        SoftRemoveSoftSign .o.
        LastOToI .o.
        InsertVowel .o.
        Cleanup;

regex Grammar;
